Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,143
Nail technology salon license; renewal; insurance.

The procedure for renewing a nail technology salon license shall be in accordance with section 38-143, except that in addition to all other requirements, the salon shall submit evidence of minimal property damage, bodily injury, and liability insurance coverage.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 63;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 94;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,214;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 405.